Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 13 Contested Elections and Primaries

Law reviews.

For note, “Georgia Election Contest Procedures,” see 22 Ga. St. B. J. 44 (1985).

21-2-520.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Contestant” means any person or persons entitled under Code Section 21-2-521 to contest the result of any primary or election.

“Defendant” means:

The person whose nomination or election is contested;

The person or persons whose eligibility to seek any nomination or office in a run-off primary or election is contested;

The election superintendent or superintendents who conducted the contested primary or election; or

The public officer who formally declared the number of votes for and against any question submitted to electors at an election.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1701, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1050, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-521.
Primaries and elections which are subject to contest; persons who may bring contest.

The nomination of any person who is declared nominated at a primary as a candidate for any federal, state, county, or municipal office; the election of any person who is declared elected to any such office (except when otherwise prescribed by the federal Constitution or the Constitution of Georgia); the eligibility of any person declared eligible to seek any such nomination or office in a run-off primary or election; or the approval or disapproval of any question submitted to electors at an election may be contested by any person who was a candidate at such primary or election for such nomination or office, or by any aggrieved elector who was entitled to vote for such person or for or against such question.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1702, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 871, § 17; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Law reviews.

For survey article on local government law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 225 (1982).

For article, “The Civil Jurisdiction of State and Magistrate Courts,” see 24 Ga. St. B. J. 29 (1987).

21-2-522.
Grounds for contest.

A result of a primary or election may be contested on one or more of the following grounds:

Misconduct, fraud, or irregularity by any primary or election official or officials sufficient to change or place in doubt the result;

When the defendant is ineligible for the nomination or office in dispute;

When illegal votes have been received or legal votes rejected at the polls sufficient to change or place in doubt the result;

For any error in counting the votes or declaring the result of the primary or election, if such error would change the result; or

For any other cause which shows that another was the person legally nominated, elected, or eligible to compete in a run-off primary or election.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1703, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 772, § 6; Ga. L. 1993, p. 617, § 10; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 16; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 261, § 1/SB 456.

21-2-522.1.
Rebuttable presumption of legal vote in contested election.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, for the purposes of election contests, a vote cast by a person who has been listed on the official list of electors for a period of ten years or longer shall be rebuttably presumed to be a legal vote despite an unsigned voter registration card, so long as that person continues to meet the eligibility requirements of Code Section 21-2-216. For such a voter, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the voter has taken the oath and that the voter registration card is a replacement of the original voter registration card.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-522.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 16A; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Law reviews.

For survey article on local government law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

21-2-523.
Jurisdiction and general pretrial proceedings; notification of proceedings; selecting administrative judge; compensation of presiding judge.

A contest case governed by this article shall be tried and determined by the superior court of the county where the defendant resides, except that a municipal contest case shall be tried and determined by the superior court of the county where the city hall is located. A contest case challenging the eligibility of the two defendants declared as eligible to compete with each other in a run-off primary or election shall be tried and determined by the superior court of the county where the defendant who received the highest number of votes resides.

The superior court having jurisdiction of a contest case governed by this article shall be presided over by a superior court judge or senior judge. The superior court judge or senior judge who presides over the contest shall be selected as set out in subsection (c) of this Code section.

Upon the filing of a contest petition, the clerk of the superior court having jurisdiction shall immediately notify the administrative judge for the judicial administrative district in which that county lies, or the district court administrator, who shall immediately notify the administrative judge, of the institution of proceedings under this article. If the county in which the proceedings were instituted is not in the circuit of the administrative judge, the administrative judge shall select a superior court judge from within the district, but not from the circuit in which the proceeding was instituted, or a senior judge not a resident of the circuit in which the proceeding was instituted, to preside over the contest.

If the administrative judge is a member of the circuit in which the proceeding was filed, or if the other judges of the district are unable or are unwilling to preside over the proceeding, or if the other judges of the district are judges of the circuit in which the proceeding was filed, then the administrative judge shall select an administrative judge of an adjoining district to select a superior court judge from that district, or a superior court judge from the district in which the proceeding was filed, but not the circuit in which the proceeding was filed, or a senior judge who is not a resident of the circuit wherein the proceeding was filed.

After a judge has agreed to preside over the case, the administrative judge who selected the judge to hear the matter shall enter an order in the superior court of the county where the proceeding was filed appointing such judge, and such judge shall promptly begin presiding over such proceedings in such court and shall determine same as soon as practicable. Such judge shall be reimbursed for his or her actual expenses for food and lodging and shall receive the same mileage as any other state officials and employees. Senior judges shall be entitled to compensation and reimbursement as the law provides for senior judge service.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1704, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 175, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 608, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Legal mileage allowance, §

50-19-7

.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Civil Jurisdiction of State and Magistrate Courts,” see 24 Ga. St. B. J. 29 (1987).

21-2-524.
Filing and allegations of petition to contest primary or election; service of petition; verification; notice of proceedings to answer petition; service of special process; amendment.

A petition to contest the result of a primary or election shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court having jurisdiction within five days after the official consolidation of the returns of that particular office or question and certification thereof by the election official having responsibility for taking such action under this chapter or within five days after the official consolidation and certification of the returns of that particular office or question by the election official having responsibility for taking such action under this chapter following a recount pursuant to Code Section 21-2-495 and shall allege:

The contestant’s qualification to institute the contest;

The contestant’s desire to contest the result of such primary or election and the name of the nomination, office, or question involved in the contest;

The name of the defendant;

The name of each person who was a candidate at such primary or election for such nomination or office in the case of a contest involving same;

Each ground of contest;

The date of the official declaration of the result in dispute;

The relief sought; and

Such other facts as are necessary to provide a full, particular, and explicit statement of the cause of contest.

The State Election Board shall be served with a copy of the petition, as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, by serving the same on the chairperson thereof, by mailing a copy to the chairperson by certified or registered mail or statutory overnight delivery; and a certificate that such service has been made shall be filed by the plaintiff or his or her attorney.

When an error in the counting of votes is alleged as a ground of contest, it is sufficient for the contestant to state generally that he or she believes that error was committed in the counting of the votes cast for the filling of the nomination or office in dispute, or for or against the question in dispute, in one or more specified precincts; and it shall not be necessary for the contestant to offer evidence to substantiate such allegation. If a recount of the votes cast in any precinct or precincts shall change the result in dispute, any aggrieved litigant may require a recount of the votes affecting such result, which were cast in any other precinct or precincts, by amending his or her pleadings and requesting such relief.

The petition shall be verified by the affidavit of each contestant. Such affidavit shall be taken and subscribed before some person authorized by law to administer oaths and shall state that the contestant believes the facts alleged therein are true, that according to the best of his or her knowledge and belief the contested result of the primary or election is illegal and the return thereof incorrect, and that the petition to contest the same is made in good faith.

A statement of the grounds of contest shall not be rejected, nor the proceedings dismissed by any court, for want of form, if the grounds of contest are alleged with such certainty as will advise the defendant of the particular proceeding or cause for which the primary or election is contested.

Upon such petition being filed, the clerk of the superior court shall issue notice, in the form of special process directed to the sheriff of such county, requiring the defendant and any other person named in such petition as a candidate for such nomination or office, if any, to appear and answer such petition, on a day to be fixed in such notice, not more than ten days nor less than five days after the service of such notice. Such notice, with a copy of the petition attached, shall be served by the sheriff upon the defendant and any other person named therein in the same manner as petitions and process are served in other civil cases. On or before the day fixed in such notice, unless for good cause shown the presiding judge shall extend the time therefor, the defendant shall appear and answer such petition and may set up by way of answer or cross action any right of interest he or she may have or claim in such proceeding. Any other person who was a candidate at such primary or election for the nomination or office involved and upon whom notice was served as provided in this subsection shall be deemed a litigant to such proceeding and may set up by way of answer or cross action any right of interest or claim he or she may have.

After filing, any petition, cross action, or answer may be amended with leave of the court so as to include the specification of additional grounds of contest, other relevant facts, or prayer for further relief. After each amendment, a reasonable time to respond shall be given by the court to any opposing litigant.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 124, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 107; Ga. L. 1898, p. 44, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 121; Code 1933, § 34-2801; Code 1933, § 34-1705, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 24; Ga. L. 1979, p. 955, § 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 32, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1748, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 4.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the amendment to subsection (b) is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

21-2-525.
Hearing; powers of court generally.

Within 20 days after the return day fixed in the notice as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 21-2-524 to the defendant, the presiding judge shall fix a place and time for the hearing of the contest proceeding. Such judge may fix additional hearings at such other times and places as are necessary to decide the contest promptly.

The court having jurisdiction of the action shall have plenary power, throughout the area in which the contested primary or election was conducted, to make, issue, and enforce all necessary orders, rules, processes, and decrees for a full and proper understanding and final determination and enforcement of the decision of every such case, according to the course of practice in other civil cases under the laws of this state, or which may be necessary and proper to carry out this chapter. The court shall have authority to subpoena and to compel the attendance of any officer of the primary or election complained of and of any person capable of testifying concerning the same; to compel the production of evidence which may be required at such hearing, in like manner and to the same extent as in other civil cases litigated before such court; to take testimony; and to proceed without delay to the hearing and determination of such contest, postponing for the purpose, if necessary, all other business.

The court may, in its discretion, limit the time to be consumed in taking testimony, dividing such time equitably among all litigants concerned, with a view therein to the circumstances of the matter and to the proximity of the next succeeding primary or election.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 124, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 107; Civil Code 1910, § 121; Code 1933, § 34-2801; Code 1933, § 34-1706, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-526.
Trial by jury.

All issues of a contest shall be fully tried and determined by the court without the aid and intervention of a jury, unless a litigant to the contest shall demand a trial by jury at any time prior to the call of the case; and the court shall determine that it is an issue which under other laws of this state the litigant is entitled to have tried by a jury. Upon such determination, a jury shall be impaneled and the cause shall proceed according to the practice and procedure of the court in jury cases.

In a case contesting the result of a primary or election held in two or more counties, each issue to be tried by a jury shall be tried by a jury impaneled in the county where such issue or a part thereof arose. Such jury shall be impaneled by the superior court of the county in which the jury trial is to be conducted; such trial shall be presided over by the judge as described in Code Section 21-2-523; and such trial shall proceed, insofar as practicable, as though it were being conducted in the county of the superior court having jurisdiction of the contest.

In a case contesting the result of a primary or election held within a single county, the court may require a jury to return only a special verdict in the form of a special written finding upon each issue of fact. In a case contesting the result of a primary or election held in two or more counties, the court shall require each jury impaneled to return only a special verdict in the form of a special written finding upon each issue of fact. In a case where a special verdict is to be rendered, the court shall submit to the jury written questions susceptible of categorical or other brief answer or may submit written forms of the several special findings which might properly be made under the pleadings and evidence; or it may use such other method of submitting the issues and requiring the written findings thereon as it deems most appropriate. The court shall give to the jury such explanation and instruction concerning the matter thus submitted as may be necessary to enable the jury to make its findings upon each issue. If, in so doing, the court omits any issue of fact raised by the pleadings or by the evidence, each party waives his or her right to a trial by jury of the issue so omitted unless before the jury retires he or she demands its submission to the jury. As to an issue omitted without such demand, the court may make a finding; or, if it fails to do so, it shall be deemed to have made a finding in accord with the judgment on the special verdict.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1707, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-527.
Pronouncement of judgment; effect of finding of misconduct by poll officers; calling of second primary, election, or runoff by court upon finding of defects.

After hearing the allegations and evidence in the contest, the court shall declare as nominated, elected, or as eligible to compete in a run-off primary or election that qualified candidate who received the requisite number of votes and shall pronounce judgment accordingly; and the clerk of the superior court shall certify such determination to the proper authority. In the case of a contest involving a question submitted to electors at an election, the court shall pronounce judgment as to whether the same was approved or disapproved; and the clerk of the superior court shall certify such determination to the defendant.

When a defendant who has received the requisite number of votes for nomination, election, or to compete in a run-off primary or election is determined to be ineligible for the nomination or office sought, the court shall pronounce judgment declaring the primary or election invalid with regard to such nomination or office and shall call a second primary or election to fill such nomination or office and shall set the date for such second primary or election.

If misconduct is complained of on the part of the poll officers of any precinct, it shall not be held sufficient to set aside the contested result unless the rejection of the vote of such precinct would change such result.

Whenever the court trying a contest shall determine that the primary, election, or runoff is so defective as to the nomination, office, or eligibility in contest as to place in doubt the result of the entire primary, election, or runoff for such nomination, office, or eligibility, such court shall declare the primary, election, or runoff to be invalid with regard to such nomination, office, or eligibility and shall call for a second primary, election, or runoff to be conducted among all of the same candidates who participated in the primary, election, or runoff to fill such nomination or office which was declared invalid and shall set the date for such second primary, election, or runoff.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1708, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 19; Ga. L. 1991, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 17; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 40; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-527.1.
Right of parties to object to settlement; court approval.

No settlement of any case under this article shall become effective unless:

All parties to such case have been given an opportunity to object to such settlement before the court; and

The court has approved such settlement.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-527.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1050, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-528.
Appeals from court’s determination on contest petition.

An appeal from the final determination of the court may be taken within ten days from the rendition thereof as in other civil cases. The filing of a notice of appeal shall not act as a stay or supersedeas. The appellant may apply to the appellate court for a stay or supersedeas, and such court shall consider applications for stays or supersedeas in such cases without regard to whether any notice of appeal has been filed or the record docketed in such cases.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1709, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 41; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 60; Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 3-7/HB 927.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 1-1/HB 927, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Appellate Jurisdiction Reform Act of 2016.’ ”

Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 6-1/HB 927, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Part III of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2017, and shall apply to cases in which a notice of appeal or application to appeal is filed on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 205 (2016).

21-2-529.
Liability for costs; methods of collecting.

The contestant and the defendant shall be liable to the officers and witnesses for the costs made by them, respectively. If the result of the primary or election is confirmed, the petition dismissed, or the prosecution fails, judgment shall be rendered against the contestant for costs; and, if the judgment is against the defendant or the result of the primary or election is set aside, he or she shall pay the costs at the discretion of the court. After entry of judgment, the costs may be collected by attachment or otherwise.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1710, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.